Hawaii statutes.
§514A-82.5
Pets in apartments. (a)
Whenever the bylaws do not forbid apartment owners from keeping animals as pets
in their apartments, the bylaws shall not forbid the tenants of the apartment
owners from keeping pets in the apartments rented or leased from the owners;
provided that:

(1) The apartment owner agrees in writing to allow
the apartment owner's tenant to keep a pet in the apartment;

(2) The tenants may keep only those types of pets
which may be kept by apartment owners;

(3) The bylaws may allow each owner or tenant to keep
only one pet in the apartment;

(4) The animals shall not include those described as
pests under section 150A-2, or animals prohibited from importation under
section 141-2, 150A-5, or 150A-6;

(5) The bylaws may include reasonable restrictions or
prohibitions against excessive noise or other problems caused by pets on the
property; and

(6) The bylaws may reasonably restrict or prohibit
the running of pets at large in the common areas of the property.

(b) Any
amendments to the bylaws pertaining to pet restrictions or prohibitions which
exempt circumstances existing prior to the adoption of the amendments shall
apply equally to apartment owners and tenants. [L 2007, c 244, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next